Alabama, session 2026rs, SB148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 11-45-2, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§11-45-2
(a) The style of an ordinance of a city or town shall
be, "Be it ordained by the city (or town) council of _______
as follows:" inserting the name of the city or town as the
case may be.
(b)(1) No ordinance or resolution intended to be of
permanent operation shall be adopted by the council at the
same meeting at which it is introduced, unless unanimous
consent of those present is given for the immediate
consideration of such the ordinance or resolution, such with
consent to be shown by a vote taken by yeas and nays, and the
names of the members voting shall be entered upon the
minutes,.
(2) and no No ordinance or resolution intended to be of
permanent operation shall become a law unless on its final
passage a majority of the members elected to said the council
in cities of over 12,000 inhabitants shall vote in its favor.
(3) In all towns and in cities of less than 12,000
populationinhabitants, an affirmative vote of a majority of
the whole number of members of the council to which the
corporation is entitled, including the mayor, shall be
required to enact any ordinance or resolution intended to be
of permanent operation.
(c)(1) Notwithstanding subsection (b), any action taken
on or after October 1, 2025, by a council to adopt a new tax
Page 2

on or after October 1, 2025, by a council to adopt a new tax
SB148 INTRODUCED
or license fee or to increase the rate of a tax or license fee
shall be subject to this subsection.
(2) Once the ordinance is introduced at a council
meeting, the council shall hold a public hearing after not
less than 30 days' notice of the public hearing.
(3) The notice shall state all of the following:
a. The substance of the proposed ordinance.
b. The amount of any proposed new tax or license fee or
the amount of the increase in any tax or license fee.
c. The date, time, and place of the public hearing.
d. That a copy of the proposed ordinance may be
obtained from the office of the municipal clerk.
(4) The notice shall be published in a newspaper of
general circulation published in the municipality or otherwise
in the same manner as the publication of an ordinance is
provided for in Section 11-45-8(b).
(5) A copy of the proposed ordinance shall be published
concurrently on the website of the municipality, if the
municipality has a website, and on the Secretary of State's
open meetings website.
(6) After the public hearing, the proposed ordinance
may be considered by the council at a regular council meeting.
(c)(d) The A council shall award no contract on bids
except by resolution."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3